Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 21. Relocation Assistance

§ 2101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates another meaning or different intent:

“Eligible person” means any individual; family; business concern, including the operation of a farm; and nonprofit organization displaced by construction on any highway project undertaken by the State of Vermont.

“Individual” means a person who is not a member of a family as defined in this section.

“Family” means two or more persons who are living together in the same quarters.

“Business concern” means a corporation, partnership, individual, or other private entity engaged in a business or professional activity necessitating tangible property for the carrying on of the business or profession on the premises.

“Moving expense” means cost of dismantling, disconnecting, crating, loading, insuring, temporary storage, transporting, unloading, reinstalling of personal property, exclusive of the cost of any additions, improvements, alterations, or other physical changes in or to any structure in connection with effecting the reinstallation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 108.

§ 2102.
Relocation assistance.

The Agency shall pay to eligible persons, displaced by construction of a highway project undertaken by the State of Vermont, reasonable and necessary moving expenses caused by their displacement from real property acquired for these purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2103.
Fixed payments.

Instead of paying the actual relocation expenses of individuals and families, the Agency may pay fixed amounts in accordance with an approved schedule of fixed amounts.
The schedule shall be of statewide application and shall provide for a graduated scale related to the size of the quarters occupied or some other uniform equitable method of scaling the payments.
The schedule shall indicate whether the individuals and families are entitled only to fixed amounts or are entitled to claim reimbursement for their actual moving expenses or fixed amounts at their election.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2104.
Rules.

The Agency is authorized to adopt rules consistent with federal regulations necessary to administer this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 118.

§ 2105.
Matching funds.

When federal funds are available for payment of direct financial assistance in situations caused by highway acquisition, the Agency may match federal funds to the extent provided by federal law and to provide direct financial assistance in the instances and on the conditions set forth by federal law and regulations.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.